New York, session 2025-2026, A10227.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1242 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 14 to read as follows: 3 14. No person, firm, association or corporation engaged in the busi- 4 ness of selling or leasing bicycles with electric assist shall sell or 5 lease any bicycle with electric assist unless such sale or lease also 6 includes a helmet suitable for use while operating such bicycle. 7 § 2. Section 1282 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 8 a new subdivision 13 to read as follows: 9 13. No person, firm, association or corporation engaged in the busi- 10 ness of selling or leasing electric scooters shall sell or lease any 11 electric scooter unless such sale or lease also includes a helmet suit- 12 able for use while operating such electric scooter. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14721-01-6